Missouri, session 2026, HB1746.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2045, to read as follows:
1.2045. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"AI Nonsentience and Responsibility Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI", the same meaning as used in 15 U.S.C.
Section 9401(3);
(2) "Deployer", any natural person, corporation, or other legally recognized
entity that creates, controls, deploys, operates, or otherwise exercises authority over an
AI system;
(3) "Developer", the party or parties primarily responsible for the design,
coding, and initial creation of an AI system, unless the AI system is released free of
charge using an Open Source Initiative approved license;
(4) "Emergent properties", any unprogrammed or adaptive behavior of an AI
system that appears to mimic human sentience;
(5) "End-user", a person or agent of a person who interacts with an AI system.
The end-user does not have control over the AI system but relies on it for specific tasks
or services;
(6) "Person", a natural person or any entity recognized as having legal
personhood under the laws of the state, explicitly excluding any AI system.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1746 & 1769 2
3. For all purposes under state law, AI systems are declared to be nonsentient
entities.
4. No AI system shall be granted the status of a person or any form of legal
personhood, nor be considered to possess consciousness, self-awareness, or similar traits
of living beings.
5. No AI system shall be recognized as a spouse, domestic partner, or hold any
personal legal status analogous to marriage or union with a human or another AI
system. Any purported attempt to marry or create a personal union with an AI system
is void and shall have no legal effect.
6. AI systems shall not be designated, appointed, or serve as any officer, director,
manager, or similar role within any corporation, partnership, or other legal entity. Any
purported appointment of an AI system to such a role is void and has no legal effect.
7. AI systems shall not be recognized as legal entities capable of owning,
controlling, or holding title to any form of property including, but not limited to, real
estate, intellectual property, financial accounts, and digital assets. All assets and
proprietary interests generated, managed, or otherwise associated with AI shall be
attributed to the human individuals or legally recognized organizations responsible for
the AI development, deployment, or operation.
8. Any direct or indirect harm caused by an AI system's operation, output, or
recommendation, when used as intended or misused, shall be the responsibility of the
deployer or user who directed or employed the AI. Developers or deployers may be held
liable if a defect in design, construction, or instructions for use of the AI system
proximately causes harm, consistent with product liability principles; however, mere
misuse or intentional wrongdoing by the user shall not impute liability to the developer
or the deployer absent proof of negligence or design defects, nor shall wrongdoing by the
developer impute liability to the developer. In cases of negligence, or gross negligence,
or malpractice, the developer or deployer shall be absolved of any criminal wrongdoing
or punitive damages, provided that the standards established in subsection 9 of this
section were followed.
9. Deployers and developers shall maintain proper oversight and control
measures over any AI system whose outputs or recommendations could reasonably be
expected to impact human welfare, property, or public safety. Failure to provide
adequate supervision or safeguards against foreseeable risks may constitute negligence
or another applicable basis of liability. For purposes of this subsection, proper oversight
is demonstrated when a developer or deployer adheres to Missouri standards for AI risk
management which shall be derived from and based on the National Institute of
Standards and Technology or NIST AI Risk Management Framework NIST AI 100-1

HCS HBs 1746 & 1769 3
standards for AI and cybersecurity. If Missouri does not have current standards or is
silent on any aspect of AI risk management, a developer or deployer of AI shall have
demonstrated proper oversight through adherence to the latest version of the NIST AI
Risk Management Framework NIST AI 100-1, or its successor.
10. An AI system is not an entity capable of bearing fault or liability in its own
right. Any attempt to shift blame solely onto an AI system shall be void as liability
remains with human actors or entities as described in this section.
11. Developers and deployers of AI systems shall prioritize safety mechanisms
designed to prevent or mitigate risk of direct harm to individuals or property.
12. (1) Merely labeling an AI system as "aligned", "ethically trained", or "value
locked" shall not excuse or diminish the deployer's or developer's liability for harm.
Deployers shall remain responsible for demonstrating adequate safety features and risk
controls commensurate with the AI's level of potential harm.
(2) Advances in software, automation, algorithmic decision-making, artificial
intelligence, and other digital technologies shall not be used as the basis for a deployer
or developer to engage in conduct that is prohibited under the law.
13. Deployers or developers of AI systems involved in severe incidents resulting
in significant bodily harm, death, or major property damage shall promptly notify the
relevant authorities and comply with any subsequent investigations.
14. The provisions of this section shall apply to all AI systems developed, owned,
deployed, or operated on or after August 28, 2026. A developer or deployer that has
formally adopted a policy to comply with this section and demonstrated an
implementation plan before August 28, 2026, shall not be subject to the requirements
of this section before March 1, 2027.
✔